Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE I. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

CHAPTER 522. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO ALL HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES AGENCIES AND CERTAIN OTHER STATE ENTITIES

SUBCHAPTER A. FISCAL PROVISIONS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0001. LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATIONS REQUEST BY HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES AGENCY. (a) Each health and human services agency shall submit to the commission a biennial agency legislative appropriations request on a date determined by commission rule.

(b) A health and human services agency may not submit the agency's legislative appropriations request to the legislature or the governor until the commission reviews and comments on the request.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0002. ACCEPTANCE OF CERTAIN GIFTS AND GRANTS BY HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES AGENCY. (a) Subject to the executive commissioner's written approval, a health and human services agency may accept a gift or grant of money, drugs, equipment, or any other item of value from a pharmaceutical manufacturer, distributor, provider, or other entity engaged in a pharmaceutical-related business.

(b) Chapter 575 does not apply to a gift or grant under this section.

(c) The executive commissioner may adopt rules and procedures to implement this section. The rules must ensure that acceptance of a gift or grant under this section:

(1) is consistent with federal laws and regulations; and

(2) does not adversely affect federal financial participation in any state program, including Medicaid.

(d) This section does not affect the commission's or a health and human services agency's authority under other law to accept a gift or grant from a person other than a pharmaceutical manufacturer, distributor, provider, or other entity engaged in a pharmaceutical-related business.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER B. CONTRACTS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0051. NEGOTIATION AND REVIEW OF CERTAIN CONTRACTS FOR HEALTH CARE PURPOSES. (a) This section applies to a contract with a contract amount of $250 million or more:

(1) under which a person will provide goods or services in connection with the provision of medical or health care services, coverage, or benefits; and

(2) that will be entered into by the person and:

(A) the commission;

(B) a health and human services agency; or

(C) any other state agency under the commission's jurisdiction.

(b) An agency described by Subsection (a)(2) must notify the office of the attorney general at the time the agency initiates the planning phase of the contracting process for a contract described by Subsection (a). A representative of the office of the attorney general or another attorney advising the agency as provided by Subsection (d) may:

(1) participate in negotiations or discussions with proposed contractors; and

(2) be physically present during those negotiations or discussions.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, before an agency described by Subsection (a)(2) may enter into a contract described by Subsection (a), a representative of the office of the attorney general shall review the form and terms of the contract and may make recommendations to the agency for changes to the contract if the attorney general determines that the office of the attorney general has sufficient subject matter expertise and resources available to provide this service.

(d) If the attorney general determines that the office of the attorney general does not have sufficient subject matter expertise or resources available to provide the services described by this section, the office of the attorney general may require the agency described by Subsection (a)(2) to enter into an interagency agreement or obtain outside legal services under Section 402.0212 for the provision of services described by this section.

(e) The agency described by Subsection (a)(2) shall provide to the office of the attorney general any information the office of the attorney general determines is necessary to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0052. PERFORMANCE STANDARDS FOR CONTRACTED SERVICES PROVIDED TO INDIVIDUALS WITH LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY. (a) This section does not apply to 2-1-1 services provided by the Texas Information and Referral Network.

(b) Each contract with the commission or a health and human services agency that requires the provision of call center services or written communications related to call center services must include performance standards that measure the effectiveness, promptness, and accuracy of the contractor's oral and written communications with individuals with limited English proficiency.

(c) A person who seeks to enter into a contract described by Subsection (b) must include in the bid or other applicable expression of interest for the contract a proposal for providing call center services or written communications related to call center services to individuals with limited English proficiency. The proposal must include a language access plan that describes how the contractor will:

(1) achieve any performance standards described in the request for bids or other applicable expressions of interest;

(2) identify individuals who need language assistance;

(3) provide language assistance measures, including the translation of forms into languages other than English and the provision of translators and interpreters;

(4) inform individuals with limited English proficiency of the language services available to them and how to obtain those services;

(5) develop and implement qualifications for bilingual staff; and

(6) monitor compliance with the plan.

(d) In determining which bid or other applicable expression of interest offers the best value, the commission or a health and human services agency, as applicable, shall evaluate the extent to which the proposal for providing call center services or written communications related to call center services in languages other than English will provide meaningful access to the services for individuals with limited English proficiency.

(e) In determining the extent to which a proposal will provide meaningful access under Subsection (d), the commission or health and human services agency, as applicable, shall consider:

(1) the language access plan described by Subsection (c);

(2) the number or proportion of individuals with limited English proficiency in the commission's or agency's eligible service population;

(3) the frequency with which individuals with limited English proficiency seek information regarding the commission's or agency's programs;

(4) the importance of the services provided by the commission's or agency's programs; and

(5) the resources available to the commission or agency.

(f) The commission or health and human services agency, as applicable, shall avoid selecting a contractor that the commission or agency reasonably believes will:

(1) provide information in languages other than English that is limited in scope;

(2) unreasonably delay the provision of information in languages other than English; or

(3) provide program information, including forms, notices, and correspondence, in English only.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER C. DATA SHARING

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0101. SHARING OF DATA RELATED TO CERTAIN GENERAL REVENUE FUNDED PROGRAMS. To the extent permitted under federal law and notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 191 or 192, Health and Safety Code, the commission and other health and human services agencies shall share data to facilitate patient care coordination, quality improvement, and cost savings in Medicaid, the child health plan program, and other health and human services programs funded using money appropriated from the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER D. COORDINATION OF MULTIAGENCY SERVICES

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0151. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "least restrictive setting" means a service setting for an individual that, in comparison to other available service settings:

(1) is most able to meet the individual's identified needs;

(2) prioritizes a home and community-based care setting; and

(3) engages the strengths of the family.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0152. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER TO CERTAIN STATE ENTITIES. This subchapter applies to the following state entities:

(1) the commission;

(2) the Department of Family and Protective Services;

(3) the Department of State Health Services;

(4) the Texas Education Agency;

(5) the Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments;

(6) the Texas Department of Criminal Justice;

(7) the Texas Department of Housing and Community Affairs;

(8) the Texas Workforce Commission; and

(9) the Texas Juvenile Justice Department.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0153. MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING REQUIRED. The state entities to which this subchapter applies shall enter into a joint memorandum of understanding to promote a system of local-level interagency staffing groups for the identification and coordination of services for individuals needing multiagency services that:

(1) are to be provided in the least restrictive setting appropriate; and

(2) use residential, institutional, or congregate care settings only as a last resort.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0154. DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING. (a) The division within the commission that coordinates the policy for and delivery of mental health services shall oversee the development and implementation of the memorandum of understanding required by this subchapter.

(b) The state entities that participate in developing the memorandum of understanding shall consult with and solicit input from advocacy and consumer groups.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0155. CONTENTS OF MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING. The memorandum of understanding required by this subchapter must:

(1) clarify the statutory responsibilities of each state entity to which this subchapter applies in relation to individuals needing multiagency services, including subcategories for different services such as:

(A) family preservation and strengthening;

(B) physical and behavioral health care;

(C) prevention and early intervention services, including services designed to prevent:

(i) child abuse;

(ii) neglect; or

(iii) delinquency, truancy, or school dropout;

(D) diversion from juvenile or criminal justice involvement;

(E) housing;

(F) aging in place;

(G) emergency shelter;

(H) residential care;

(I) after-care;

(J) information and referral; and

(K) investigation services;

(2) include a functional definition of "individuals needing multiagency services";

(3) outline membership, officers, and necessary standing committees of local-level interagency staffing groups;

(4) define procedures aimed at eliminating duplication of services relating to assessment and diagnosis, treatment, residential placement and care, and case management of individuals needing multiagency services;

(5) define procedures for addressing disputes between the state entities that relate to the entities' areas of service responsibilities;

(6) provide that each local-level interagency staffing group includes:

(A) a local representative of each state entity;

(B) representatives of local private sector agencies; and

(C) family members or caregivers of individuals needing multiagency services or other current or previous consumers of multiagency services acting as general consumer advocates;

(7) provide that the local representative of each state entity has authority to contribute entity resources to solving problems identified by the local-level interagency staffing group;

(8) provide that if an individual's needs exceed the resources of a state entity, the entity may, with the consent of the individual's legal guardian, if applicable, submit a referral on behalf of the individual to the local-level interagency staffing group for consideration;

(9) provide that a local-level interagency staffing group may be called together by a representative of any member state entity;

(10) provide that a state entity representative may be excused from attending a meeting if the staffing group determines that the age or needs of the individual to be considered are clearly not within the entity's service responsibilities, provided that each entity representative is encouraged to attend all meetings to contribute to the collective ability of the staffing group to solve an individual's need for multiagency services;

(11) define the relationship between state-level interagency staffing groups and local-level interagency staffing groups in a manner that defines, supports, and maintains local autonomy;

(12) provide that records used or developed by a local-level interagency staffing group or the group's members that relate to a particular individual are confidential and may not be released to any other person or agency except as provided by this subchapter or other law; and

(13) provide a procedure that permits the state entities to share confidential information while preserving the confidential nature of the information.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0156. ADOPTION OF MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING; REVISIONS. Each state entity to which this subchapter applies shall adopt the memorandum of understanding required by this subchapter and all revisions to the memorandum. The entities shall develop revisions as necessary to reflect major reorganizations or statutory changes affecting the entities.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0157. STATE-LEVEL INTERAGENCY STAFFING GROUP DUTIES; BIENNIAL REPORT. The state entities to which this subchapter applies shall ensure that a state-level interagency staffing group provides:

(1) information and guidance to local-level interagency staffing groups regarding:

(A) the availability of programs and resources in the community; and

(B) best practices for addressing the needs of individuals with complex needs in the least restrictive setting appropriate; and

(2) a biennial report to the administrative head of each entity, the legislature, and the governor that includes:

(A) the number of individuals served through the local-level interagency staffing groups and the outcomes of the services provided;

(B) a description of any identified barriers to the state's ability to provide effective services to individuals needing multiagency services; and

(C) any other information relevant to improving the delivery of services to individuals needing multiagency services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER E. PUBLIC ACCESS TO MEETINGS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0201. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "agency" means the commission or a health and human services agency.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0202. ADDITIONAL APPLICABILITY TO CERTAIN ADVISORY BODIES. (a) The requirements of this subchapter also apply to the meetings of any advisory body that advises the executive commissioner or an agency.

(b) The archived video and audio recording of an advisory body's meeting must be made available through the Internet website of the agency to which the advisory body provides advice.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0203. INTERNET BROADCAST AND ARCHIVE OF OPEN MEETING. (a) An agency shall:

(1) broadcast over the Internet live video and audio of each open meeting of the agency;

(2) make a video and audio recording of reasonable quality of the broadcast; and

(3) provide access to the archived video and audio recording on the agency's Internet website in accordance with Subsection (c).

(b) An agency may use for an Internet broadcast of an open meeting of the agency a room made available to the agency on request in any state building, as that term is defined by Section 2165.301.

(c) Not later than the seventh day after the date an open meeting is broadcast under this section, the agency shall make available through the agency's Internet website the archived video and audio recording of the open meeting. The agency shall maintain the archived video and audio recording on the agency's Internet website until at least the second anniversary of the date the recording was first made available on the website.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0204. INTERNET NOTICE OF OPEN MEETING. An agency shall provide on the agency's Internet website the same notice of an open meeting that the agency is required to post under Subchapter C, Chapter 551. The notice must be posted within the time required for posting notice under Subchapter C, Chapter 551.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0205. EXEMPTION UNDER CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. An agency is exempt from the requirements of this subchapter to the extent a catastrophe, as defined by Section 551.0411, or a technical breakdown prevents the agency from complying with this subchapter. Following the catastrophe or technical breakdown, the agency shall make all reasonable efforts to make available in a timely manner the required video and audio recording of the open meeting.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0206. CONTRACTING AUTHORIZED. The commission shall consider contracting through competitive bidding with a private individual or entity to broadcast and archive an open meeting subject to this subchapter to minimize the cost of complying with this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER F. FACILITIES

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0251. LEASE OR SUBLEASE OF CERTAIN OFFICE SPACE. (a) A health and human services agency, with the commission's approval, or the Texas Workforce Commission or any other state agency that administers employment services programs may lease or sublease office space to a private service entity or lease or sublease office space from a private service entity that provides publicly funded health, human, or workforce services to enable agency eligibility and enrollment personnel to work with the entity if:

(1) client access to services would be enhanced; and

(2) the colocation of offices would improve the efficiency of the administration and delivery of services.

(b) Subchapters D and E, Chapter 2165, do not apply to a state agency that leases or subleases office space to a private service entity under this section.

(c) Subchapter B, Chapter 2167, does not apply to a state agency that leases or subleases office space from a private service entity under this section.

(d) A state agency is delegated the authority to enter into a lease or sublease under this section and may negotiate the terms of the lease or sublease.

(e) To the extent authorized by federal law, a state agency may share business resources with a private service entity that enters into a lease or sublease agreement with the agency under this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0252. ASSUMPTION OF LEASE FOR IMPLEMENTATION OF INTEGRATED ENROLLMENT SERVICES INITIATIVE. (a) A health and human services agency, with the commission's approval, or the Texas Workforce Commission or any other state agency that administers employment services programs may assume a lease from an integrated enrollment services initiative contractor or subcontractor to implement the initiative at one development center, one mail center, or 10 or more call or change centers.

(b) Subchapter B, Chapter 2167, does not apply to a state agency that assumes a lease from a contractor or subcontractor under this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 522.0253. PREREQUISITES FOR ESTABLISHING NEW HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES FACILITY IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. A health and human services agency may not establish a new facility in a county with a population of less than 200,000 until the agency provides notice about the facility and the facility's location and purpose to:

(1) each state representative and state senator who represents all or part of the county;

(2) the county judge who represents the county; and

(3) the mayor of any municipality in which the facility would be located.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.